Louisiana, session 2026, HB640.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:35.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§35.2. Membership of the House of Representatives
The House of Representatives of the Legislature of Louisiana shall be
composed of one hundred five members. The state shall be divided into the
representative districts provided in this Section. One representative shall be elected
from each district.
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8,
1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 1-12, 1-13, 1-14, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 3-1, 6-10, 11-1, 11-2, 11-6, 11-9,
11-10, 12-1, 12-3, 12-7, 12-8, and 12-9 of Caddo Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 2-5A, 2-6, 2-8, 2-12A, 2-12B, 2-13,
2-23, and 4-8D of Bossier Parish and Precincts 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6,
3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 4-1, 4-2, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 5-6, and 5-7 of Caddo Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Precincts 5-8, 5-9, 5-11, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-7,
7-5, 7-6, 7-8, 7-9, 10-1, 10-3, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-4, and 11-5 of
Caddo Parish.
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(4) District 4 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 3-3, 6-6,
6-8, 6-9, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-7, 7-10, 12-2, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-10, and 12-11 of
Caddo Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-3B, 1-5, 4-7A,
4-7B, 4-8B, 4-8C, 4-8E, 4-8G, 4-9, and 4-10 of Bossier Parish; Precincts 9-1, 9-4,
9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, and 9-13 of Caddo Parish; and Red River Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-10,
5-10, 6-1, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 9-2, 9-3, 9-8, and 10-2 of Caddo
Parish.
(7) District 7 is composed of Precincts 11-3, 11-7, and 11-8 of Caddo Parish;
DeSoto Parish and Precincts 3-5, 6-2, 6-3, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-5, 8-1, 8-2, 9-2, 9-3, 9-4,
and 9-5 of Sabine Parish.
(8) District 8 is composed of Precincts 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-4, 2-7, 2-9, 2-10,
2-11, 2-17A, 2-18B, 2-18C, 2-18F, 2-18G, 2-18H, 2-18I, 2-19, 2-21A, 2-21B, 2-21C,
2-21D, 2-21E, 2-22A, 2-22B, and 2-22C of Bossier Parish.
(9) District 9 is composed of Precincts 1-4, 2-3, 2-3A, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16,
2-17B, 2-20, 4-2, 4-2A, 4-3A, 4-3B, 4-3D, 4-4A, 4-4B, 4-5A, 4-6A, 4-6B, 4-8A,
4-11A, 4-11B, and 4-11C of Bossier Parish.
(10) District 10 is composed of Precincts 2-18D, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, and 4-1A
of Bossier Parish and Webster Parish.
(11) District 11 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-7, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 3-1,
3-2, 3-3, 3-6, and 3-7 of Bienville Parish; Claiborne Parish; and Precincts 1-1, 1-2,
1-3, 2-1, 3-1, 3-3, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, 10-1, 10-2, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 11-1, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5,
12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, and 12-6 of Lincoln Parish.
(12) District 12 is composed of Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3,
4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3,
9-4, and 10-3 of Lincoln Parish and Union Parish.
(13) District 13 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 3-4, 3-5, 4-1,
4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of Bienville
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
Parish; Jackson Parish; Precincts 1-2, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-7A, 2-8, and
2-9 of Natchitoches Parish; and Winn Parish.
(14) District 14 is composed of Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 36, 42, 43, 50,
59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 75, 76, 77, and 78 of Ouachita Parish.
(15) District 15 is composed of Precincts 32, 33, 38, 39, 40, 41, 44, 44A, 45,
49, 51, 51A, 52, 52A, 53, 54, 55, 56, 56A, and 57 of Ouachita Parish.
(16) District 16 is composed of Precincts 1, 3-1, 6, 7, 8, 12, 13, 14, 16, 20,
21, 31, 32, 35, 37, 39-1, and 39-2 of Morehouse Parish and Precincts 3, 8, 9, 9A, 65,
65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74, and 79 of Ouachita Parish.
(17) District 17 is composed of Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 27, 28, 30, 31, 34, 35, 37, 46, 47, and 48 of Ouachita Parish.
(18) District 18 is composed of Precincts 31 and 32 of Iberville Parish;
Pointe Coupee Parish; Precincts 1A, 4A, 18, 19, 20, 21, and 22 of West Baton Rouge
Parish; and West Feliciana Parish.
(19) District 19 is composed of Precincts 4, 15, 17, and 18 of East Carroll
Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 14 of Madison Parish; Precincts 23,
24, 26-1, 27, 29, 40, 42, 45, 47, 48, 51, 53, and 54 of Morehouse Parish; Richland
Parish; and West Carroll Parish.
(20) District 20 is composed of Caldwell Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 2-2,
3-1, 3-2, 4-1, 4-2, 5-1, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-3A, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, and 9-4 of Catahoula Parish;
Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 4A, 4B, 6, 12, 13, 13A, 14, 21, 22, 27, 30, 31, 32, and 33 of
Franklin Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 4-2, 5-1, 6-2, 7-1, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, and 10-1 of
LaSalle Parish; and Precincts 25, 26, and 58 of Ouachita Parish.
(21) District 21 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-1A, 2-1, 2-1A, 6-5, 6-5A,
7-1, 7-1A, 7-3, 7-5, and 8-1 of Catahoula Parish; Concordia Parish; Precincts 1, 3,
5, 5A, 5B, 6, 7, 9, 10, 13, 14, 16, and 19 of East Carroll Parish; Precincts 16, 18, 19,
20, and 24 of Franklin Parish; Precincts 11, 12, 13, 15, 17, 17A, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22,
23, 24, 25, and 26 of Madison Parish; and Tensas Parish.
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(22) District 22 is composed of Grant Parish; Precincts 2-1, 3-1, 3-2, 4-3,
7-2, 8-2, 8-3, 8-5, 8-7, and 9-5 of LaSalle Parish; and Precincts 1-3, 1-3A, 1-4, 1-4A,
1-6, 1-7, 1-11, 1-12, 1-13, and 4-9 of Natchitoches Parish.
(23) District 23 is composed of Precincts 2-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15,
3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 4-3, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 5-8, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 6-7, 6-8,
6-9, 7-12, 7-15, 7-16, 7-21, 7-27B, 16-8, 16-9, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12,
17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15, and 17-16 of Orleans Parish.
(24) District 24 is composed of Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 17A, 19, 20,
and 21 of Beauregard Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-4, 2-1, 2-2, 2-6, 3-2, 3-6, 4-1, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 5-4, and 5-8 of Sabine Parish; and Precincts 1-7, 1-9, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-2A,
2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 4-3, 4-3B, 4-3L, 4-3N, 5-1, 5-2, 5-2A, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3,
6-4, 7-3, 7-4A, 8-1, 8-2, and 8-3 of Vernon Parish.
(25) District 25 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-1A, 1-5, 1-5A, 1-8, 1-9,
1-9A, 1-10, 1-10A, 1-10B, 1-14, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-10, 4-1,
4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, and 4-8 of Natchitoches Parish and Precincts C22, C23,
C30, C31, C33, C34, C35, C36, C37-A, C37-B, C41, C42, S1, S2, S4, S5, S6A, S6B,
S8, S9, S11, S13, S14, and S15 of Rapides Parish.
(26) District 26 is composed of Precincts C1, C2, C3, C4, C5, C6, C7, C8,
C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13, C14, C15, C17, C18, C19, C20, C21, C24, C25, C26,
C27, C28, C32, C38-A, C38-B, C39, C40, N1, N2, N3, N4, and N5 of Rapides
Parish.
(27) District 27 is composed of Precincts N6, N7, N8, N9, N10, N11, N12,
N13-A, N13-B, N14-A, N14-B, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19, N20, N21,
N22, N23, N24, N25, N26, N27, N28, N29, and S16 of Rapides Parish.
(28) District 28 is composed of Avoyelles Parish and Precincts 1, 1A, 1B,
1C, 1D, 4, 4A, and 4B of St. Landry Parish.
(29) District 29 is composed of Precincts 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24,
1-25, 1-26, 1-58, 1-77, 1-85, 2-16, 2-23, 2-27, and 2-30 of East Baton Rouge Parish
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
and Precincts 1B, 1C, 1D, 1E, 2A, 2B, 3, 4B, 5, 6, 7A, 7B, 8, 9, 10, 13A, 13B, 14A,
14B, 15, 16, and 17 of West Baton Rouge Parish.
(30) District 30 is composed of Precincts 7, 15, 16, 16A, 17, 18, 18A, 25,
25B, 26, 27, 27A, 27B, 28, 28A, and 30 of Beauregard Parish and Precincts 1-1,
1-1A, 1-1B, 1-2, 1-3, 1-3C, 1-4, 1-4B, 1-4C, 1-5, 1-5A, 1-6, 1-6A, 1-6B, 1-7B, 1-8,
1-8A, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3A, 4-3C, 4-3G, 4-3K, 7-1, 7-2, 7-2A, 7-2B, 7-4, 7-5, 7-5A, and
7-5D of Vernon Parish.
(31) District 31 is composed of Precincts 34, 35, 36, 67, 85, 86, 105, 106,
109, 117, 125, and 133 of Lafayette Parish and Precincts 22, 24, 25, 26, 26A, 26B,
32, 34, 34A, 35, 36A, 37, 39, 46, 46C, 46D, and 46E of Vermilion Parish.
(32) District 32 is composed of Allen Parish; Precincts 9, 10, 11, 11B, 14,
14A, and 22 of Beauregard Parish; Precincts 560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603, 660,
661, 662, 663, 664, and 760 of Calcasieu Parish; and Precincts 17 of Jefferson Davis
Parish.
(33) District 33 is composed of Precincts 400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 405, 406,
407, 408, 460E, 460W, 461, 465, 466E, 466W, 467, 468, 469, 700, 701, 702, 703,
761, and 762 of Calcasieu Parish.
(34) District 34 is composed of Precincts 300, 301, 303, 304, 305, 307, 308,
309E, 309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E, 313W, 315E, 315W, 318, 319N, 319S, 320E,
320W, 321, 322, 323, 324, 328, 329, 330, 361, and 364 of Calcasieu Parish.
(35) District 35 is composed of Precincts 12, 12A, and 13 of Beauregard
Parish and Precincts 160E, 160W, 161, 162E, 162W, 163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W,
167, 302, 306, 314, 316E, 317, 440, 441, 463, and 464 of Calcasieu Parish.
(36) District 36 is composed of Precincts 316W, 325, 326, 327, 331, 332N,
332S, 333, 334, 335, 336, 337, 338, 339, 340, 362, 363, 366, 367, 368, 369, and 372
of Calcasieu Parish.
(37) District 37 is composed of Precincts 261, 262, 360, 800, 801, 860N,
860S, 861E, and 861W of Calcasieu Parish and Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5A, 6, 7, 8,
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
8A, 9A, 9B, 10, 10A, 12, 13, 14, 16, 16A, 18, 19, 20, 21, 23, and 23B of Jefferson
Davis Parish.
(38) District 38 is composed of Precincts 1010, 1020, 1030, 1031, 1040,
1041, 1050, 1080, 1081, 1090, 1091, 1100, 1101, 1110, 1120, 1130, 1140, 1150,
1160, 1161, 1162, 1170, 1171, 2010A, 3010, 3020, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3040, 3050,
3051, 3052, 3060, 3070, 3071, 4001, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4020, 4021, 4030, 4040,
5004, 5010, 5020, 5030, 5040, 5041, and 5050 of Evangeline Parish and Precincts
S7, S10, S17, S18, S19, S20, S21, S22, S23, S24, S25, S26, S27, S28, and S29 of
Rapides Parish.
(39) District 39 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 26, 29, 30,
31, 50, 71, 113, 114, 119, 122, 123, and 124 of Lafayette Parish.
(40) District 40 is composed of Precincts 6, 8, 9, 9A, 10, 10A, 11, 11B, 12,
13, 13A, 14, 14A, 14B, 15, 18, 18A, 18B, 19, 19A, 20, 20B, 21, 21A, 22, 22B, 23,
23A, 24, 24B, 25, 26, 26A, 27, 28, 29, 29A, 34, 34A, 35, 36, 37, and 37A of St.
Landry Parish.
(41) District 41 is composed of Precincts 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4,
3-5, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-6, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of Acadia Parish; Precincts 2010, 2020,
2030, and 2040 of Evangeline Parish and Precincts 32, 32A, 33, 33A, 41, 41A, 42,
43, 44, 44A, 44B, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 50A, 51, 51A, and 52 of St. Landry Parish.
(42) District 42 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7,
1-8, 2-2, 2-5, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 6-7,
6-8, 6-10, 6-12, 6-13, 6-14, 6-15, and 6-16 of Acadia Parish and Precincts 27, 28, and
37 of Lafayette Parish.
(43) District 43 is composed of Precincts 87, 88, 89, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96,
97, 98, 99, 104, 115, 120, 121, 126, 127, 128, and 130 of Lafayette Parish.
(44) District 44 is composed of Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 51, 52, 53, 55, 57, 58, 60, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 72, and 112
of Lafayette Parish.
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(45) District 45 is composed of Precincts 32, 33, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44,
45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 69, 70, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, and 90 of
Lafayette Parish.
(46) District 46 is composed of Precincts 2, 2A, 2B, 2C, 3, 5, 7, 7A, 16, 16A,
17, 30, 30A, 30B, 31, 38, 39, 39A, and 40 of St. Landry Parish and Precincts 16, 17,
20, 21, 22, 23, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, and
43 of St. Martin Parish.
(47) District 47 is composed of Precincts 260, 365, 370, 371N, and 371S of
Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 7A, 7B, 7C, 8, 9, 10,
11, 12, 14, 16, 17, 18, 19, 19A, 20, 20A, 20B, 21, 21A, 23, 28, 29, 30, 31, 38, 40, 56,
and 57B of Vermilion Parish.
(48) District 48 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 2-2, 2-3, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 5-1,
6-2, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 9-2, 9-4, 9-5, 11-3, 11-5, 13-4, 14-1, and 14-5
of Iberia Parish; Precincts 100, 101, 102, 110, 134, and 135 of Lafayette Parish; and
Precincts 3, 4, and 5 of St. Martin Parish.
(49) District 49 is composed of Precincts 3-5, 5-2, 5-5, 6-5, 10-3, 10-4, 12-4,
13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-5, 14-3, and 14-4 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 103, 107, 108, 111,
116, 118, and 136 of Lafayette Parish; and Precincts 41, 42, 44, 45, 45A, 46B, 47,
49, 49A, 49B, 49C, 50, 51, 53, and 57A of Vermilion Parish.
(50) District 50 is composed of Precincts 1 and 2 of St. Martin Parish and
Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22,
23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 38, 39, and 42 of St. Mary
Parish.
(51) District 51 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 4-3, and 4-4
of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-4, 1-6, 11-3, and 11-5 of Lafourche
Parish; Precincts 37, 40, 41, 43, 44, and 45 of St. Mary Parish; and Precincts 1, 2, 5,
7, 8, 10, 11, 27, 28, 33, 37, 64, 67, and 76 of Terrebonne Parish.
(52) District 52 is composed of Precincts 12, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 35, 38, 39,
41, 42, 43, 45, 48, 51, 68, 69, 81, 83, 84, 85, 87, 90, 94, and 95 of Terrebonne Parish.
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(53) District 53 is composed of Precincts 19, 20, 23, 25, 29, 31, 34, 49, 52,
53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 71, 72, 73, 88, 100, and 110 of Terrebonne Parish.
(54) District 54 is composed of Precincts 1-GI of Jefferson Parish and
Precincts 3-2, 3-3, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 7-3, 8-1, 9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2,
10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 10-15, 10-16, 11-1,
and 11-2 of Lafourche Parish.
(55) District 55 is composed of Precincts 1-3, 1-5, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5,
2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 3-1, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 5-1,
5-1A, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, and 11-4 of Lafourche Parish.
(56) District 56 is composed of Precincts 1-4, 1-6, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6,
3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-5, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2,
7-3, 7-4, and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish and Precinct 1-7 of St. John the Baptist Parish.
(57) District 57 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-5, and 4-4 of St.
Charles Parish and Precincts 1-2, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 3-4, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2,
4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, and 7-4 of
St. John the Baptist Parish.
(58) District 58 is composed of Precincts 23, 28, 30, 36, 37, 38, 39, 42, 44,
45, 47, 48, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 57, and 73 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 4,
5, 7, 10, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, and 22 of St. James Parish; and Precincts 1-1,
1-3, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, and 3-3 of St. John the Baptist Parish.
(59) District 59 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 6, 7, 8, 9, 11, 16, 17, 19, 20,
61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 72, 77, and 78 of Ascension Parish.
(60) District 60 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 4-1, 5-1, 5-2,
5-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 8-1, and 9-1 of Assumption Parish and Precincts
1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 10B, 11, 12, 13, 14, 14A, 15, 15A, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22,
24, 25, 26, 27, 28, and 29 of Iberville Parish.
(61) District 61 is composed of Precincts 1-2, 1-7, 1-14, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29,
1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-33, 1-36, 1-37, 1-40, 1-50, 1-54, 1-57, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-64,
1-78, 1-93, 1-96, and 1-104 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(62) District 62 is composed of Precincts 1-11, 1-84, 2-3, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12,
2-14, 2-15, 2-17, 2-25, 2-26, and 2-28 of East Baton Rouge Parish and East Feliciana
Parish.
(63) District 63 is composed of Precincts 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-94, 1-95, 1-100,
1-101, 2-2, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-13, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-22, 2-24, 2-29, 2-31, 2-32,
2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, and 2-38 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(64) District 64 is composed of Precincts 2-6 and 2-7 of East Baton Rouge
Parish and Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A, 3, 3A, 3B, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 5B, 5D, 39A,
39B, 40, and 40A of Livingston Parish.
(65) District 65 is composed of Precincts 1-97, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-6, 3-9,
3-12, 3-14, 3-21, 3-25, 3-26, 3-30, 3-32, 3-37, 3-46, 3-54, 3-58, 3-61, and 3-72 of
East Baton Rouge Parish.
(66) District 66 is composed of Precincts 1-89, 1-98, 1-103, 3-10, 3-16, 3-19,
3-22, 3-34, 3-38, 3-43, 3-45, 3-47, 3-53, 3-56, 3-59, 3-63, 3-66, 3-67, 3-70, 3-71,
3-73, 3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(67) District 67 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-10, 1-13,
1-15, 1-16, 1-38, 1-45, 1-46, 1-51, 1-67, 1-102, 3-20, 3-44, 3-50, 3-57, and 3-69 of
East Baton Rouge Parish.
(68) District 68 is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-35, 1-39, 1-41, 1-42, 1-44,
1-48, 1-56, 1-59, 1-65, 1-73, 1-79, 1-105, 1-106, 3-17, 3-18, 3-35, 3-36, 3-49, 3-51,
3-52, and 3-74 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(69) District 69 is composed of Precincts 1-34, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53, 1-72, 1-74,
1-80, 1-99, 3-3, 3-7, 3-11, 3-13, 3-15, 3-27, 3-29, 3-31, 3-39, 3-41, and 3-60 of East
Baton Rouge Parish.
(70) District 70 is composed of Precincts 1-12, 1-43, 1-47, 1-66, 1-69, 1-75,
1-76, 1-107, 3-4, 3-5, 3-23, 3-33, 3-40, 3-48, 3-55, 3-62, 3-64, 3-65, and 3-68 of East
Baton Rouge Parish.
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(71) District 71 is composed of Precincts 7A, 23, 23A, 23B, 23C, 24, 24B,
24C, 24D, 25, 26, 26A, 26B, 26C, 27, 28, 35, 35A, 36, 39, and 41 of Livingston
Parish.
(72) District 72 is composed of St. Helena Parish and Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15,
16, 17, 43, 46, 47, 49, 101, 102, 104, 106, 107, 109, 111A, 115B, 119, 123, and
129A of Tangipahoa Parish.
(73) District 73 is composed of Precincts 70, 70A, 71, 72, 73, 74, 116, 120,
120B, 122A, 122B, 122C, 124, 137, 137A, 137B, 137C, 137D, 143, 143A, 145, 147,
149, 149A, and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(74) District 74 is composed of Precincts 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206, 207,
302, 303, 304, 305, 308, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505, 602, 603, 604, 606, 609, A01, A02,
A02A, A03, A04, C09, F01, and P01 of St. Tammany Parish.
(75) District 75 is composed of Washington Parish.
(76) District 76 is composed of Precincts 801, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809,
810, 811, 812, 813, 814, 816, 817, 818, 908, 909, 909A, 918, 922, S10, S11, S16,
S17, S21, S23, and S24 of St. Tammany Parish.
(77) District 77 is composed of Precincts 101, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107,
108, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 301, 310, 314, C01, C02, C03, C04,
C06, C07, C08, and C11 of St. Tammany Parish.
(78) District 78 is composed of Precincts 9, 11, 21, 22, 51, 52, 53, 54, 56, 57,
58, 59, 61, 62, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H,
8-H, and 9-H of Jefferson Parish.
(79) District 79 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17,
1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 12-K, 34-K,
and 35-K of Jefferson Parish.
(80) District 80 is composed of Precincts 18, 19, 20, 23, 24, 29, 31, 32, 33,
35, 36, 37, 40, 70, 71, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, and 87 of
Jefferson Parish.
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(81) District 81 is composed of Precincts 14, 15, 27, 34, 35, 40, 65, 66, and
69 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 7B, 7D, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 18A, 21, 21A, 21B, 22,
31, 32, 33, 34, and 43 of Livingston Parish; and Precincts 6, 8, 9, 11, and 23 of
St. James Parish.
(82) District 82 is composed of Precincts 38, 43, 60, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69,
72, 80, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106,
125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 131, 132, 133, 134, 136, and 138 of Jefferson
Parish.
(83) District 83 is composed of Precincts 150A, 150B, 151, 152, 153, 154,
155, 156, 157A, 170, 179B, 180, 187, 188, 191, 200, 201, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W,
6-W, and 7-W of Jefferson Parish.
(84) District 84 is composed of Precincts 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 182, 183,
184, 185A, 185B, 189, 190, 192, 193A, 193B, 194A, 194B, 198, 199, 202, 203, 204,
246, 247, 248, and 1-L of Jefferson Parish.
(85) District 85 is composed of Precincts 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231,
232A, 234, 235, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 12-G,
and 13-G of Jefferson Parish.
(86) District 86 is composed of Precincts 28, 33, 40A, 41, 42, 44, 45B, 72A,
106A, 108, 110, 112, 114, 117, 118, 118A, 120A, 121, 121A, 127, 139, 141, and
141A of Tangipahoa Parish.
(87) District 87 is composed of Precincts 171, 172, 173, 179A, 181, 195,
196, 197A, 197B, 205, 210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A,
and 217 of Jefferson Parish.
(88) District 88 is composed of Precincts 3, 4, 5, 10, 12, 13, 18, 21, 22, 24,
25, 26, 31, 32, 33, 41, 43, 58, 68, and 76 of Ascension Parish.
(89) District 89 is composed of Precincts 102, 103, 306, 401, 402, 403, 404,
405, 407, 410, 413, 414, 415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 421, 426, 427, 429, M01, M02,
M04, M06, M07, M08, M11, M12, and MD1 of St. Tammany Parish.
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(90) District 90 is composed of Precincts 802, 802A, 803, 815, 815A, 902,
903, 903A, 904, 906, 907, 910, 911, 914, 916, 921, S01, S02, S03, S04, S05, S06,
S07, S08, S09, S13, S15, S18, S19, and S22 of St. Tammany Parish.
(91) District 91 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 2-6, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7,
10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10,
11-11, 11-12, 11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9,
12-10, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 14-20, 14-21, 14-23,
14-24A, 14-25, and 14-26 of Orleans Parish.
(92) District 92 is composed of Precincts 7, 8, 10, 55, 104, 108, 115, 116,
11-K, 13-KA, 13-KB, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K,
24-K, 25-K, 26-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 31-K, and 33-K of Jefferson Parish.
(93) District 93 is composed of Precincts 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 3-1, 4-2,
5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10,
7-11, 7-13, 7-14, 7-20, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12, 9-10, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23,
9-25, and 9-26 of Orleans Parish.
(94) District 94 is composed of Precincts 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 34, 39, 41, 42,
44, 45 and 46 of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A,
4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 7-41, 7-42, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A,
17-19, and 17-20 of Orleans Parish.
(95) District 95 is composed of Precincts 5A, 6, 6A, 6B, 7, 7C, 8A, 8B, 9,
10, 11, 11A, 12, 13A, 13B, 19, 19A, 20, 29, 30, 36A, and 38 of Livingston Parish
and Precincts 45A, 125, 133, and 133A of Tangipahoa Parish.
(96) District 96 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-7, 1-8, 2-1, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3,
5-3, 6-1, 6-4, 9-1, 10-1, 10-2, 11-1, 11-4, 11-6, 12-1, 12-2, and 12-3 of Iberia Parish;
Precincts 54, 56, and 59 of Lafayette Parish; and Precincts 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 18, 19, 24, and 25 of St. Martin Parish.
(97) District 97 is composed of Precincts 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25,
7-25A, 7-26, 7-27, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40,
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30,
9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D, and 9-33 of Orleans Parish.
(98) District 98 is composed of Precincts 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6,
13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-1, 14-2, 14-3,
14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15,
14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-19, 16-1, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 17-1,
17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, and 17-7 of Orleans Parish.
(99) District 99 is composed of Precincts 7-1, 8-1, 8-2, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5,
9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-32, 9-34A, 9-35,
9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E,
9-43F, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43M, and 9-43N of Orleans Parish.
(100) District 100 is composed of Precincts 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A,
9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-43G, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-44,
9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N,
9-44O, 9-44P, 9-44Q, 9-45, and 9-45A of Orleans Parish.
(101) District 101 is composed of Precincts 1-9, 1-20, 1-55, 1-60, 1-70, 1-71,
1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-87, 1-88, 1-90, 2-1, 3-8, 3-24, 3-28, and 3-42 of East Baton
Rouge Parish.
(102) District 102 is composed of Precincts 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5, 15-6,
15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14, 15-14A,
15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A, 15-15B, 15-16,
15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A,
15-19B, and 15-19C of Orleans Parish.
(103) District 103 is composed of St. Bernard Parish.
(104) District 104 is composed of Precincts 307, 309, 312, 312A, 313, 406,
408, 409, 411, 412, 420, 422, 430, 605, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705, 706, 901, 905, 913,
915, 917, M09, M09A, and M10 of St. Tammany Parish.
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
(105) District 105 is composed of Precincts 216B, 232B, 236, 237, 238A,
and 238B of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 15-18D and 15-18E of Orleans Parish; and
Plaquemines Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 24:35.3 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any
person holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the
appointment or election is based upon a House of Representatives district as composed
pursuant to R.S. 24:35.3. Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election
based upon a House of Representatives district and that is to be filled after January 10, 2028,
shall be appointed or elected based upon the district as it is described in Section 1 of this
Act.
Page 14 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-399 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 640
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the Louisiana House of Representatives at the regularly
scheduled election for members of the Louisiana House of Representatives in 2027, the
provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved
by the legislature, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval for the purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the Louisiana House of
Representative and for all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall
become effective at 10:00 a.m. on January 10, 2028.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.